Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB184.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13.6(a) introductory paragraph of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 13.6(A) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (C) OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985, ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 13.6. Visiting team physician.(a) Licensure exemption.--A physician who is licensed in good standing to practice in another state or country shall be <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 exempt from the licensure requirements of this act while practicing in this Commonwealth if either of the following apply:* * *(C) DURATION.--AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE VALID FOR THE FOLLOWING DURATION:(1) AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) SHALL REMAIN IN FORCE WHILE THE PHYSICIAN IS TRAVELING WITH THE SPORTS TEAM BUT SHALL BE NO LONGER THAN [TEN] 45 DAYS IN DURATION PER SPORTING EVENT. [A MAXIMUM OF 20 ADDITIONAL DAYS PER SPORTING EVENT MAY BE GRANTED UPON PRIOR REQUEST TO THE BOARD BY THE PHYSICIAN BUT MAY NOT EXCEED 30 DAYS TOTAL.] THE EXEMPTION MAY NOT EXCEED 45 DAYS UNLESS GRANTED UPON PRIOR REQUEST TO THE BOARD BY THE PHYSICIAN.(2) AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) SHALL REMAIN IN FORCE DURING THE TIME CERTIFIED BY THE NATIONAL SPORT GOVERNING BODY. THE EXEMPTION MAY NOT EXCEED [30] 45 DAYS UNLESS GRANTED UPON PRIOR REQUEST TO THE BOARD BY THE PHYSICIAN.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0184PN0128 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021